Utah, session 2026, HB193.
Section 1. Section 63G-29-101 is amended to read:29. Limitations on Government63G-29-101. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)(a)"Governmental entity" means:(i)the state;(ii)a county, city, town, school district, special district, special service district, or other political subdivision of the state; or(iii)an independent entity.(b)"Governmental entity" includes an agency, bureau, office, department, division, board, commission, institution, laboratory, or other instrumentality of an entity described in Subsection (1)(a).(2)"Hormonal transgender treatment" means the same as that term is defined in Section 58-1-603.(2)(3)"Independent entity" means the same as that term is defined in Section 63E-1-102.(3)(4)"Members of a person's social network" means the people a person authorizes to be part of the person's social media communications and network.(5) "Public funds" means the same as that term is defined in Section 51-7-3.(4)(6)(a)"Social credit score" means a numeric, alphanumeric, or alphabetic value or other categorization assigned to a person based on:(i)the person's:(A)compliance or noncompliance with government guidance;(B)social media post;(C)participation or membership in a lawful club, association, or union;(D)political affiliation; or(E)employment industry or employer; or(ii)the identity of the members of the person's social network.(b)"Social credit score" does not include:(i)a consumer report as defined in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a;(ii)compliance or noncompliance with statute, administrative rule, or other law; or(iii)a numeric, alphanumeric, or alphabetic value or other categorization assigned to a person for:(A)purposes of education, training, or job performance assessment;(B)purposes of a contest or competition;(C)purposes of hiring a prospective employee or independent contractor;(D)purposes of issuance or taking an action against a professional license, certification, registration, or permit;(E)purposes of a professional or tax audit; or(F)use by a financial institution or an affiliate of a financial institution regulated under Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 6801 et seq., to determine risk of loss, impairment, or default.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63G-29-301 is enacted to read:3. Limitations on Use of Public Funds63G-29-301.  Public funding for transgender treatment or procedure prohibited -- Exception -- Coverage for detransitioning.(1)A governmental entity may not expend public funds to pay or otherwise reimburse, either directly or indirectly, any person for the performance of:(a)except as provided in Subsection (2), hormonal transgender treatment;(b)a primary sex characteristic surgical procedure as defined in Section 58-67-102; or(c)a secondary sex change characteristic surgical procedure as defined in Section 58-67-102.(2)If, on May 5, 2026, an individual was undergoing hormonal transgender treatment that was, as of that date, payable or reimbursable by public funds, the individual may complete that course of treatment on the same terms of payment or reimbursement that were available for that course of treatment on May 5, 2026, until that course of treatment ends, if the physician overseeing that course of treatment determines that it is medically necessary to continue the course of treatment.(3)A government entity that, before May 6, 2026, via insurance coverage, paid or otherwise reimbursed a person, either directly or indirectly, for the treatment or a surgical procedure described in Subsection (1) that was performed before May 6, 2026, to transition an individual from the individual's biological sex, the government entity shall offer the same type and amount of insurance coverage for treatment or a surgical procedure to restore that individual, to the extent possible, to that individual's biological sex.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.